src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON I_1_1_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p
	+Gen-ын:%>ын Clit;
	+Gen-ын:%>ын S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_2д_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p
	+Abl-аас:%>аас Clit;
	+Abl-аас:%>аас S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p
	+Ins-аар:%>аар Clit;
	+Ins-аар:%>аар S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p
	+Com-тай:%>тай Clit;
	+Com-тай:%>тай S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p
	+Dir-=руу:%>=руу Clit;
	+Dir-=руу:%>=руу S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iх_p
	+Refl-аа:%>хаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
	+Kh-х:%>х S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_p
	+Poss-хан:%>хан Clit;
	+Poss-хан:%>хан S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_p
	+Dat-д:%>ад Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>ад S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p
	+Abl-аас:%>аас Clit;
	+Abl-аас:%>аас S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p
	+Ins-аар:%>аар Clit;
	+Ins-аар:%>аар S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p
	+Com-тай:%>тай Clit;
	+Com-тай:%>тай S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p
	+Refl-аа:%>гаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_3аа_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_p
	+Gen-ы:%>ы Clit;
	+Gen-ы:%>ы S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_3аа_205_v1_1_p
	+Dat-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p
	+Abl-аас:%>аас Clit;
	+Abl-аас:%>аас S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p
	+Ins-аар:%>аар Clit;
	+Ins-аар:%>аар S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p
	+Com-тай:%>тай Clit;
	+Com-тай:%>тай S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1_p
	+Dir-=руу:%>=руу Clit;
	+Dir-=руу:%>=руу S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_11х_206_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_12хан_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iх_p
	+Refl-аа:%>хаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_11х_206_v1_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_12хан_206_v1_1_p
	+Poss-хан:%>хан Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p
	+Refl-аа:%>гаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p
	+Refl-аа:%>гаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_2д_201_v1_1
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iг_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_3яа_202_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_4г_202_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_5аас_202_v1_1_iг_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_6аар_202_v1_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iг_p
	+Refl-аа:%>гаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_p
	+Gen-н:%>н Clit;
	+Gen-н:%>н S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_3яа_202_v1_1_p
	+Dat-яа:%>яа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_4г_202_v1_1_p
	+Acc-г:%>г Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_5аас_202_v1_1_iг_p
	+Abl-аас:%>гаас Clit;
	+Abl-аас:%>гаас S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_5аас_202_v1_1_iг;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_6аар_202_v1_1_iг_p
	+Ins-аар:%>гаар Clit;
	+Ins-аар:%>гаар S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_6аар_202_v1_1_iг;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_202_10аа_204_v1_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_202_11х_204_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_202_12хан_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_202_10аа_204_v1_1_iх_p
	+Refl-аа:%>хаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_202_11х_204_v1_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_1н_202_v1_1_202_12хан_204_v1_1_p
	+Poss-хан:%>хан Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_5аас_202_v1_1_iг
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_5аас_202_v1_1_iг_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_5аас_202_v1_1_iг_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_6аар_202_v1_1_iг
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_6аар_202_v1_1_iг_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_201_6аар_202_v1_1_iг_202_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iг_p
	+Refl-аа:%>гаа Clit;
LEXICON I_1_1_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_1_2_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p
	+Gen-ын:%>ын Clit;
	+Gen-ын:%>ын S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_2д_201_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p
	+Abl-оос:%>оос Clit;
	+Abl-оос:%>оос S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p
	+Ins-оор:%>оор Clit;
	+Ins-оор:%>оор S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p
	+Com-той:%>той Clit;
	+Com-той:%>той S0_0_7той_201_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_9=рүү_201_v2_1_p
	+Dir-=рүү:%>=рүү Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_201_10оо_203_v2_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_201_2д_202_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_201_10оо_203_v2_1_iх_p
	+Refl-оо:%>хоо Clit;
